Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-309
Age and schooling certificate; Department of Labor to prescribe form.

The age and schooling certificate provided for herein shall be made out upon blank forms prescribed and furnished by the Department of Labor.

Laws 1907, c. 66, § 9, p. 263;

R.S.1913, § 3583;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. III, § 9, p. 554;

C.S.1922, § 7677;

C.S.1929, § 48-309;

R.S.1943, § 48-309;

Laws 1945, c. 116, § 1, p. 389;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 10.
July 18, 2026